Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB761.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6903YC (1) 91 ms/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 331.604, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. Except as otherwise provided by state law, paragraph 3 âbâ of this subsection, subsection 4 , or section 331.605 , the 4 recorder shall collect a fee of five dollars for each page or 5 fraction of a page of an instrument which that is filed or 6 recorded in the recorderâs office. If a page or fraction of 7 a page contains more than one transaction, the recorder shall 8 collect the fee for each transaction. 9 b. The recorder may also charge, in addition to any other 10 fee imposed by law, a convenience fee for the filing or 11 recording of an instrument for a person who is not a resident 12 of the county, unless that person pays property tax to the 13 county and provides proof of payment such as a receipt as 14 provided in section 445.5, subsection 6, or another form of 15 proof as determined by the county. The recorder shall not 16 charge a convenience fee in excess of ten dollars. All moneys 17 collected pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited into 18 the county recorderâs records management fund and used for the 19 purposes described in subsection 2, paragraph âbâ . 20